District of Columbia statutes.
16-831.12

Jurisdiction.

The court shall retain jurisdiction to enforce, modify, or terminate a custody order issued under this chapter, subject to the provisions of Chapter 46 of this title, until the child reaches 18 years of age.

Sept. 20, 2007, D.C. Law 17-21, § 2(b), 54 DCR 6835
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 217(m), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Safe and Stable Homes for Children and Youth Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-69, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6826).